Utah statutes.
58-81-102.   Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the state licensing board created for each of the health
care practitioners included in Subsection (2).
(2)  "Health care practitioner" includes:
(a)  a podiatrist licensed under Chapter 5a, Podiatric Physician Licensing
Act;
(b)  a physical therapist licensed under Chapter 24b, Physical Therapist
Practice Act;
(c)  a nurse or advanced practice registered nurse licensed under Chapter 31b,
Nurse Practice Act;
(d)  a recreational therapist licensed under Chapter 40, Recreational
Therapist Practice Act;
(e)  an occupational therapist licensed under Chapter 42a, Occupational
Therapy Practice Act;
(f)  a nurse midwife licensed under Chapter 44a, Nurse Midwife Practice Act;
(g)  a mental health professional licensed under Chapter 60, Mental Health
Professional Practice Act;
(h)  a physician licensed under Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act;
(i)  an osteopath licensed under Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice
Act;
(j)  a dentist or dental hygienist licensed under Chapter 69, Dentist and
Dental Hygienist Practice Act;
(k)  a physician assistant licensed under Chapter 70a, Physician Assistant
Act;
(l)  a pharmacist licensed under Chapter 17b, Pharmacy Practice Act; or
(m)  an optometrist licensed under Chapter 16a, Utah Optometry Practice Act.
(3)  "Qualified location" means:
(a)  a clinic, hospital, church, or organization whose primary purpose is to
sponsor, promote, or organize uncompensated health care services for people
unable to pay for health care services; and
(b)  is a location approved by the division.
(4)  "Remuneration or compensation" is as defined in Section 58-13-3.
(5)  "Supervising professional" means a health care practitioner:
(a)  who has an active license in the state in good standing;
(b)  with a scope of practice that is appropriate for supervising the
applicant as determined by the division and board; and
(c)  who is practicing at the qualified location.
(6)  "Supervision" means:
(a)  the level of supervision required for:
(i)  a social service worker in Chapter 60, Mental Health Profession Practice
Act;
(ii)  a dental hygienist in Chapter 69, Dentist and Dental Hygienist Practice
Act;
(iii)  a recreational therapist technician in Chapter 40, Recreational
Therapist Practice Act; and
(iv)  an occupational technician assistant in Chapter 42a, Occupational
Therapy Practice Act; and
(b)  for the health care practitioners listed in Subsections (2)(a) through
(m) and not included in Subsection (5)(a):
(i)  entering into a delegation of service agreement with a supervising
professional in accordance with Subsection 58-81-103(2);
(ii)  having the ability to contact the supervising professional during the
time the volunteer is providing volunteer services; and
(iii)  for every 40 hours of volunteer service hours, meeting with the
supervising professional.
(7)  "Volunteer" means the individual health care practitioner:
(a)  will devote the health care practitioner's practice exclusively to
providing care to the needy and indigent in the state:
(i)  within:
(A)  the practitioner's scope of practice; and
(B)  the delegation of service agreement between the volunteer and the
supervising professional; and
(ii)  at a qualified location;
(b)  will agree to donate professional services in a qualified location; and
(c)  will not receive remuneration or compensation for the health care
practitioner's services.
